Wyoming, session 2025, HB0007.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-20-201(h) is amended to read:

21-20-201. Agreement between districts and
postsecondary education institutions required; student
participation; credits; financial arrangements;
transportation; accessibility; required annual reporting.

HB0007

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0183
(h) Each school district board of trustees shall in
conjunction with the University of Wyoming, community
college district boards of trustees or other post secondary
education institutions accredited by recognized and
accepted accrediting agencies, make post secondary
education options programs pursuant to this section
reasonably accessible to eligible students, which shall
include ensuring access to not less than twelve (12) post
secondary credit hours to be completed in grades nine (9)
through twelve (12).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0007